Rhode Island, session 2025, SB782.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 45-19-4.1 of the General Laws in Chapter 45-19 entitled "Relief of
Injured and Deceased Fire Fighters and Police Officers" is hereby amended to read as follows:
45-19-4.1. Tuition to children of police officers dying or disabled as a result of service.
(a) If an active member of the police force of a city or town is killed, dies, or becomes
totally and permanently disabled from injuries received while in the performance of his or her duty
as a member, or dies of a heart condition or any condition derived from hypertension while still a
member, there shall be paid out of the general fund of the state of Rhode Island the charges for the
tuition of children of the deceased or totally and permanently disabled police officer and/or the
spouse of a police officer killed in the line of duty. The benefits are extended to the children and/or
spouse who are attending or may attend the University of Rhode Island, Rhode Island College, or
any other college or university operated by the state; provided, that the child has entered the
institution while between the ages of sixteen (16) and twenty-one (21); and provided, further, that
the aid granted is available to the child and/or spouse for the period of time that may equal the
normal time for completing the courses regularly offered by the institution, but in no case more
than four (4) years.
(b) For the purpose of this section, the words “police officer” mean and include any
member of the state police, any correctional officer within the department of corrections, or the
police of any city or town regularly employed at a fixed salary or wage. Furthermore, this excludes

auxiliary and volunteer police officers of city, town, or state police. For the purpose of this section,
the words “totally and permanently disabled” mean any impairment of mind or body making it
impossible for one to follow continuously a gainful occupation.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC001751
========
LC001751 - Page 2 of 3